Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
Article 11. Benefits.

§ 71-5-501.
Payment.

Wages earned for services defined in Section 71-5-11(I)(15)(g), irrespective of when performed, shall not be included for purposes of determining eligibility under Section 71-5-511(e) or weekly benefit amount under Section 71-5-503 nor shall any benefits with respect to unemployment be payable under Section 71-5-505 on the basis of such wages. All benefits shall be paid through employment offices or such other agency or agencies as the department may, by regulation, designate, in accordance with such regulations as the department may prescribe. The department may, by regulation, prescribe that benefits due and payable to claimants who die prior to the receipt or cashing of benefits checks may be paid to the legal representative, dependents, or next of kin, of the deceased as may be found by it to be equitably entitled thereto, and every such payment shall be deemed a valid payment to the same extent as if made to the legal representative of the decedent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7373; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 1; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 2a; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 1a; Laws, 1956, ch. 404, § 1a; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 1a; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 1a; Laws, 1971, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 562, § 4; Laws, 2013, ch. 309, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2013).

§ 71-5-503.
Weekly benefit amount.

An individual’s weekly benefit amount for a benefit year shall be one-twenty-sixth (

1 26

Click to view) of his total wages for insured work paid during that quarter of his base period in which such total wages were highest, computed to the next lower multiple of One Dollar ($1.00), if not a multiple of One Dollar ($1.00).

On or before June 15 of each year, the total wages reported on contribution reports for the preceding calendar year shall be divided by the average monthly number of insured workers (determined by dividing the total insured workers reported on contribution reports pursuant to the regulations of the department for the preceding year by twelve (12)). The average annual wage thus obtained shall be divided by fifty-two (52) and the average weekly wage thus determined rounded to the nearest cent. Sixty percent (60%) of this amount, rounded to the nearest dollar, shall constitute the maximum “weekly benefit amount” paid to any individual whose benefit year commences on or after July 1 of such year and prior to July 1 of the next following year; provided however, that the maximum weekly benefit amount shall not exceed Two Hundred Ten Dollars ($210.00) for any benefit year that begins on or after July 1, 2002, and shall not exceed Two Hundred Thirty Dollars ($230.00) for any benefit year that begins on or after July 1, 2008, and shall not exceed Two Hundred Thirty-five Dollars ($235.00) for any benefit year that begins on or after July 1, 2009. The minimum weekly benefit amount for the individual shall be Thirty Dollars ($30.00). If an individual’s weekly benefit amount would compute to less than the said minimum, then such individual would be entitled to no benefits.

An individual’s weekly benefit amount, as determined at the beginning of his benefit year, shall constitute his weekly benefit amount throughout such benefit year.

The Mississippi Department of Employment Security, with the assistance of the United States Department of Labor, is directed to generate actuarially sound models for computation of weekly benefit amounts. Such models shall include scenarios for increasing the weekly benefit amounts at each increment from the minimum to the maximum amount and the impact such increments would have on the Unemployment Compensation Fund. Such report shall be provided to the Mississippi Legislature on or before December 31, 2008.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7374; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 1; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 2b; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 1b; Laws, 1956, ch. 404, § 1b; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 1b; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 1b; Laws, 1971, ch. 519, § 2; Laws, 1974, ch. 570, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 382; Laws, 1979, ch. 465, § 3; Laws, 1982, ch. 349, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 364, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 438; Laws, 1986, ch. 316, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 322, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 511, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 507, § 6; Laws, 1998, ch. 423, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 413, § 1; Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 43, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 37; Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 38; Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 71-5-505.
Weekly compensation for unemployment.

For weeks beginning on or after July 1, 1991, each eligible individual who is totally unemployed or part totally unemployed in any week shall be paid with respect to such week a benefit in an amount equal to his weekly benefit amount less that part of his wages, if any, payable to him with respect to such week which is in excess of Forty Dollars ($40.00). Such individuals must have been totally unemployed or part totally unemployed for a waiting period of one (1) week during which he earned less than his weekly benefit amount plus Forty Dollars ($40.00). Such benefit for a benefit year effective on or after October 1, 1983, if not a multiple of One Dollar ($1.00), shall be computed to the next lower multiple of One Dollar ($1.00). Provided, however, that remuneration for “inactive duty training” or “unit training assembly” payable to such eligible individual who is a member of any of the reserve components, or remuneration for jury duty pursuant to a lawfully issued summons therefor payable to such eligible individual, shall not be considered wages which serve to reduce the otherwise payable benefit amount.

In determining whether an eligible individual is unemployed during a week, the date of commencing a shift shall determine the week for which the earnings are deducted.

However, the one-week waiting period described herein shall be waived if the President of the United States declares a major disaster with regard to individual assistance in accordance with Section 401 of The Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act. The department, in its discretion, shall have the authority to noncharge an employer account for any benefits paid for unemployment due directly to such disaster, but only in those counties and/or areas identified by the disaster area for individual assistance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7375; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 1; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 2c; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 1c; Laws, 1956, ch. 404, § 1c; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 1c; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 1c; Laws, 1979, ch. 381; Laws, 1983, ch. 364, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 511, § 4; Laws, 1999, ch. 306, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 12; Laws, 2013, ch. 309, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2013).

§ 71-5-506.
Advice to claimants as to taxation of benefits; change of withholding status; deduction and withholding of tax.

An individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall, at the time of filing such claim, be advised that:

Unemployment compensation is subject to federal, state and local income tax;

Requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax payments;

The individual may elect to have federal income tax deducted and withheld from the individual’s payment of unemployment compensation at the amount specified in the Federal Internal Revenue Code;

The individual shall be permitted to change a previously elected withholding status.

Amounts deducted and withheld from unemployment compensation shall remain in the unemployment fund until transferred to the federal taxing authority as a payment of income tax.

The commission shall follow all procedures specified by the United States Department of Labor and the Federal Internal Revenue Service pertaining to the deducting and withholding of income tax.

Amounts shall be deducted and withheld in accordance with the priorities established in regulations developed by the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 464, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 71-5-507.
Duration.

Any otherwise eligible individual shall be entitled during any benefit year to a total amount of regular benefits equal to twenty-six (26) times his weekly benefit amount or one-third (1/3) of his total wages for insured work paid during his base period, whichever is the lesser. Provided, that for a benefit year effective prior to October 1, 1983, if such total amount of benefits is not a multiple of One Dollar ($1.00), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of One Dollar ($1.00); and for a benefit year effective on or after October 1, 1983, if such total amount of benefits is not a multiple of One Dollar ($1.00), it shall be computed to the next lower multiple of One Dollar ($1.00). An individual’s total amount of regular benefits as determined at the beginning of his benefit year shall constitute his total amount of regular benefits throughout such benefit year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7376; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 1; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 2d; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 1d; Laws, 1956, ch. 404, § 1d; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 1d; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 1d; Laws, 1971, ch. 519, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 364, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1983).

§ 71-5-509.
Seasonal workers.

For the purposes of this section, cotton ginning and professional baseball only are classified as seasonal industries.

The term “seasonal worker” means an individual who is employed in a seasonal industry, and who has base period wages paid on and after July 1, 1983, in such seasonal industry, except that the term shall not include workers in such industry where employment continues substantially throughout the year. Any individual who has earnings in a seasonal industry having a seasonal operating period within the limits shown in the first column at the end of this subsection, and who has base period wages earned in such seasonal industry in the nonoperating season of such seasonal industry in an amount equal to the amount specified on the corresponding line of the second column at the end of this subsection, shall be considered as having employment which continues substantially throughout the year and shall not be considered a seasonal worker.

Click to view

The commission shall prescribe fair and reasonable general rules consistent with this chapter which are applicable to seasonal workers for determining the period or periods during which benefits shall be payable to them. The commission may prescribe fair and reasonable general rules with respect to such other matters relating to benefits for seasonal workers as the commission finds necessary and consistent with the policy and purposes of this chapter.

Operating Period ofSeasonal Industry Wages Earned in Seasonal IndustryDuring Nonoperating Period 27-36 Weeks 24 Times Weekly Benefit Amount 6-26 Weeks 30 Times Weekly Benefit Amount

HISTORY:
[Prior §71-5-509, Codes, 1942, § 7377, Laws, 1940, ch. 295, repealed by implication by Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 2] Laws, 1983, ch. 369; Laws, 1986, ch. 319, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 13, 1986).

§ 71-5-511.
Eligibility conditions [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

An unemployed individual shall be eligible to receive benefits with respect to any week only if the department finds that:

(i) He has registered for work at and thereafter has continued to report to the department in accordance with such regulations as the department may prescribe; except that the department may, by regulation, waive or alter either or both of the requirements of this subparagraph as to such types of cases or situations with respect to which it finds that compliance with such requirements would be oppressive or would be inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter; and

He participates in reemployment services, such as job search assistance services, if, in accordance with a profiling system established by the department, it has been determined that he is likely to exhaust regular benefits and needs reemployment services, unless the department determines that:

1. The individual has completed such services; or

2. There is justifiable cause for the claimant’s failure to participate in such services.

He has made a claim for benefits in accordance with the provisions of Section 71-5-515 and in accordance with such regulations as the department may prescribe thereunder.

He is able to work, available for work and actively seeking work.

He has been unemployed for a waiting period of one (1) week. No week shall be counted as a week of unemployment for the purposes of this subsection:

Unless it occurs within the benefit year which includes the week with respect to which he claims payment of benefits;

If benefits have been paid with respect thereto;

Unless the individual was eligible for benefits with respect thereto, as provided in Sections 71-5-511 and 71-5-513, except for the requirements of this subsection.

For weeks beginning on or before July 1, 1982, he has, during his base period, been paid wages for insured work equal to not less than thirty-six (36) times his weekly benefit amount; he has been paid wages for insured work during at least two (2) quarters of his base period; and he has, during that quarter of his base period in which his total wages were highest, been paid wages for insured work equal to not less than sixteen (16) times the minimum weekly benefit amount. For benefit years beginning after July 1, 1982, he has, during his base period, been paid wages for insured work equal to not less than forty (40) times his weekly benefit amount; he has been paid wages for insured work during at least two (2) quarters of his base period, and he has, during that quarter of his base period in which his total wages were highest, been paid wages for insured work equal to not less than twenty-six (26) times the minimum weekly benefit amount. For purposes of this subsection, wages shall be counted as “wages for insured work” for benefit purposes with respect to any benefit year only if such benefit year begins subsequent to the date on which the employing unit by which such wages were paid has satisfied the conditions of Section 71-5-11, subsection H, or Section 71-5-361, subsection (3), with respect to becoming an employer.

No individual may receive benefits in a benefit year unless, subsequent to the beginning of the next preceding benefit year during which he received benefits, he performed service in “employment” as defined in Section 71-5-11, subsection I, and earned remuneration for such service in an amount equal to not less than eight (8) times his weekly benefit amount applicable to his next preceding benefit year.

Benefits based on service in employment defined in Section 71-5-11, subsection I(3) and I(4), and Section 71-5-361, subsection (4) shall be payable in the same amount, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as compensation payable on the basis of other service subject to this chapter, except that benefits based on service in an instructional, research or principal administrative capacity in an institution of higher learning (as defined in Section 71-5-11, subsection N) with respect to service performed prior to January 1, 1978, shall not be paid to an individual for any week of unemployment which begins during the period between two (2) successive academic years, or during a similar period between two (2) regular terms, whether or not successive, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual’s contract, if the individual has a contract or contracts to perform services in any such capacity for any institution or institutions of higher learning for both such academic years or both such terms.

Benefits based on service in employment defined in Section 71-5-11, subsection I(3) and I(4), shall be payable in the same amount, on the same terms and subject to the same conditions as compensation payable on the basis of other service subject to this chapter, except that:

With respect to service performed in an instructional, research or principal administrative capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall not be paid based on such services for any week of unemployment commencing during the period between two (2) successive academic years, or during a similar period between two (2) regular but not successive terms, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual’s contract, to any individual, if such individual performs such services in the first of such academic years or terms and if there is a contract or a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform services in any such capacity for any educational institution in the second of such academic years or terms, and provided that subsection (g) of this section shall apply with respect to such services prior to January 1, 1978. In no event shall benefits be paid unless the individual employee was terminated by the employer.

With respect to services performed in any other capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall not be paid on the basis of such services to any individual for any week which commences during a period between two (2) successive academic years or terms, if such individual performs such services in the first of such academic years or terms and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the second of such academic years or terms, except that if compensation is denied to any individual under this subparagraph and such individual was not offered an opportunity to perform such services for the educational institution for the second of such academic years or terms, such individual shall be entitled to a retroactive payment of compensation for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim for compensation and for which compensation was denied solely by reason of this clause. In no event shall benefits be paid unless the individual employee was terminated by the employer.

With respect to services described in subsection (h)(i) and (ii), benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services in any such capacities to any individual for any week which commences during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if such individual performs such services in the first of such academic years or terms, or in the period immediately before such vacation period or holiday recess, and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the period immediately following such vacation period or holiday recess.

With respect to any services described in subsection (h)(i) and (ii), benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services in any such capacities as specified in subsection (h)(i), (ii) and (iii) to any individual who performed such services in an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency. For purposes of this subsection, the term “educational service agency” means a governmental agency or governmental entity which is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing such services to one or more educational institutions.

With respect to services to which Sections 71-5-357 and 71-5-359 apply, if such services are provided to or on behalf of an educational institution, benefits shall not be payable under the same circumstances and subject to the same terms and conditions as described in subsection (h)(i), (ii), (iii) and (iv).

Subsequent to December 31, 1977, benefits shall not be paid to any individual on the basis of any services substantially all of which consist of participating in sports or athletic events or training or preparing to so participate, for any week which commences during the period between two (2) successive sports seasons (or similar periods) if such individual performs such services in the first of such seasons (or similar periods) and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the later of such seasons (or similar periods).

(i) Subsequent to December 31, 1977, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services performed by an alien, unless such alien is an individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence at the time such services were performed, was lawfully present for purposes of performing such services, or was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time such services were performed (including an alien who was lawfully present in the United States as a result of the application of the provisions of Section 203(a)(7) or Section 212(d)(5) of the Immigration and Nationality Act).

Any data or information required of individuals applying for benefits to determine whether benefits are not payable to them because of their alien status shall be uniformly required from all applicants for benefits.

In the case of an individual whose application for benefits would otherwise be approved, no determination that benefits to such individual are not payable because of his alien status shall be made, except upon a preponderance of the evidence.

An individual shall be deemed prima facie unavailable for work, and therefore ineligible to receive benefits, during any period which, with respect to his employment status, is found by the department to be a holiday or vacation period.

A temporary employee of a temporary help firm is considered to have left the employee’s last work voluntarily without good cause connected with the work if the temporary employee does not contact the temporary help firm for reassignment on completion of an assignment. A temporary employee is not considered to have left work voluntarily without good cause connected with the work under this paragraph unless the temporary employee has been advised in writing:

That the temporary employee is obligated to contact the temporary help firm on completion of assignments; and

That unemployment benefits may be denied if the temporary employee fails to do so.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1972, § 7378; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 3; Laws, 1954, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 2; Laws, 1971, ch. 519, § 4; Laws, 1977, ch. 497, § 7; Laws, 1978, ch. 339, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 480, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 358; Laws, 1984, ch. 498, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 417, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 357, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 507, § 7; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 38; Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 38; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 380; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 39; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 39; Laws, 2013, ch. 309, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2013); reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 38, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-513.
Disqualifications [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

A. An individual shall be disqualified for benefits:

For the week, or fraction thereof, which immediately follows the day on which he left work voluntarily without good cause, if so found by the department, and for each week thereafter until he has earned remuneration for personal services performed for an employer, as in this chapter defined, equal to not less than eight (8) times his weekly benefit amount, as determined in each case; however, marital, filial and domestic circumstances and obligations shall not be deemed good cause within the meaning of this subsection. Pregnancy shall not be deemed to be a marital, filial or domestic circumstance for the purpose of this subsection.

For the week, or fraction thereof, which immediately follows the day on which he was discharged for misconduct connected with his work, if so found by the department, and for each week thereafter until he has earned remuneration for personal services performed for an employer, as in this chapter defined, equal to not less than eight (8) times his weekly benefit amount, as determined in each case.

The burden of proof of good cause for leaving work shall be on the claimant, and the burden of proof of misconduct shall be on the employer.

For the week, or fraction thereof, with respect to which he willfully makes a false statement, a false representation of fact, or willfully fails to disclose a material fact for the purpose of obtaining or increasing benefits under the provisions of this law, if so found by the department, and such individual’s maximum benefit allowance shall be reduced by the amount of benefits so paid to him during any such week of disqualification; and additional disqualification shall be imposed for a period not exceeding fifty-two (52) weeks, the length of such period of disqualification and the time when such period begins to be determined by the department, in its discretion, according to the circumstances in each case.

If the department finds that he has failed, without good cause, either to apply for available suitable work when so directed by the employment office or the department, to accept suitable work when offered him, or to return to his customary self-employment (if any) when so directed by the department, such disqualification shall continue for the week in which such failure occurred and for not more than the twelve (12) weeks which immediately follow such week, as determined by the department according to the circumstances in each case.

In determining whether or not any work is suitable for an individual, the department shall consider among other factors the degree of risk involved to his health, safety and morals, his physical fitness and prior training, his experience and prior earnings, his length of unemployment and prospects for securing local work in his customary occupation, and the distance of the available work from his residence; however, offered employment paying the minimum wage or higher, if such minimum or higher wage is that prevailing for his customary occupation or similar work in the locality, shall be deemed to be suitable employment after benefits have been paid to the individual for a period of eight (8) weeks.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no work shall be deemed suitable and benefits shall not be denied under this chapter to any otherwise eligible individual for refusing to accept new work under any of the following conditions:

If the position offered is vacant due directly to a strike, lockout or other labor dispute;

If the wages, hours or other conditions of the work offered are substantially unfavorable or unreasonable to the individual’s work. The department shall have the sole discretion to determine whether or not there has been an unfavorable or unreasonable condition placed on the individual’s work. Moreover, the department may consider, but shall not be limited to a consideration of, whether or not the unfavorable condition was applied by the employer to all workers in the same or similar class or merely to this individual;

If as a condition of being employed the individual would be required to join a company union or to resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization;

If unsatisfactory or hazardous working conditions exist that could result in a danger to the physical or mental well-being of the worker. In any such determination the department shall consider, but shall not be limited to a consideration of, the following: the safety measures used or the lack thereof and the condition of equipment or lack of proper equipment. No work shall be considered hazardous if the working conditions surrounding a worker’s employment are the same or substantially the same as the working conditions generally prevailing among workers performing the same or similar work for other employers engaged in the same or similar type of activity.

Pursuant to Section 303(1) of the Social Security Act (42 USCS 503), the department may conduct drug tests of applicants for unemployment compensation for the unlawful use of controlled substances as a condition for receiving such compensation, if such applicant:

The department may deny unemployment compensation to any applicant based on the result of a drug test conducted by the department in accordance with this subsection. A positive drug test result shall be deemed by the department to be a failure to accept suitable work, and shall subject the applicant to the disqualification provisions set forth in this subsection A(3). During the disqualification period imposed by the department under this subsection, the individual may provide information to end the disqualification period early by submitting acceptable proof to the department of a negative test result from a testing facility approved by the department.

Was terminated from employment with the claimant’s most recent employer, as defined by Mississippi law, because of the unlawful use of controlled substances; or

Is an individual for whom suitable work, as defined by Mississippi law, is only available in an occupation (as determined under regulations issued by the U.S. Secretary of Labor) that requires drug testing.

Pursuant to the provisions set forth in this subsection A(3)(c), the department shall have the authority to institute a random drug testing program for all individuals who meet the requirements set forth in this section. Moreover, the department shall have the authority to create the necessary regulations, policies rules, guidelines and procedures to implement such a program.

Any term or provision set forth in this subsection A(3)(c) that otherwise conflicts with federal or state law shall be disregarded but shall not, in any way, affect the remaining provisions.

For any week with respect to which the department finds that his total unemployment is due to a stoppage of work which exists because of a labor dispute at a factory, establishment or other premises at which he is or was last employed; however, this subsection shall not apply if it is shown to the satisfaction of the department:

He is unemployed due to a stoppage of work occasioned by an unjustified lockout, if such lockout was not occasioned or brought about by such individual acting alone or with other workers in concert; or

He is not participating in or directly interested in the labor dispute which caused the stoppage of work; and

He does not belong to a grade or class of workers of which, immediately before the commencement of stoppage, there were members employed at the premises at which the stoppage occurs, any of whom are participating in or directly interested in the dispute.

If in any case separate branches of work which are commonly conducted as separate businesses in separate premises are conducted in separate departments of the same premises, each such department shall, for the purposes of this subsection, be deemed to be a separate factory, establishment or other premises.

For any week with respect to which he has received or is seeking unemployment compensation under an unemployment compensation law of another state or of the United States. However, if the appropriate agency of such other state or of the United States finally determines that he is not entitled to such unemployment compensation benefits, this disqualification shall not apply. Nothing in this subsection contained shall be construed to include within its terms any law of the United States providing unemployment compensation or allowances for honorably discharged members of the Armed Forces.

For any week with respect to which he is receiving or has received remuneration in the form of payments under any governmental or private retirement or pension plan, system or policy which a base-period employer is maintaining or contributing to or has maintained or contributed to on behalf of the individual; however, if the amount payable with respect to any week is less than the benefits which would otherwise be due under Section 71-5-501, he shall be entitled to receive for such week, if otherwise eligible, benefits reduced by the amount of such remuneration. However, on or after the first Sunday immediately following July 1, 2001, no social security payments, to which the employee has made contributions, shall be deducted from unemployment benefits paid for any period of unemployment beginning on or after the first Sunday following July 1, 2001. This one hundred percent (100%) exclusion shall not apply to any other governmental or private retirement or pension plan, system or policy. If benefits payable under this section, after being reduced by the amount of such remuneration, are not a multiple of One Dollar ($1.00), they shall be adjusted to the next lower multiple of One Dollar ($1.00).

For any week with respect to which he is receiving or has received remuneration in the form of a back pay award, or other compensation allocable to any week, whether by settlement or otherwise. Any benefits previously paid for weeks of unemployment with respect to which back pay awards, or other such compensation, are made shall constitute an overpayment and such amounts shall be deducted from the award by the employer prior to payment to the employee, and shall be transmitted promptly to the department by the employer for application against the overpayment and credit to the claimant’s maximum benefit amount and prompt deposit into the fund; however, the removal of any charges made against the employer as a result of such previously paid benefits shall be applied to the calendar year and the calendar quarter in which the overpayment is transmitted to the department, and no attempt shall be made to relate such a credit to the period to which the award applies. Any amount of overpayment so deducted by the employer and not transmitted to the department shall be subject to the same procedures for collection as is provided for contributions by Sections 71-5-363 through 71-5-381. Any amount of overpayment not deducted by the employer shall be established as an overpayment against the claimant and collected as provided above. It is the purpose of this paragraph to assure equity in the situations to which it applies, and it shall be construed accordingly.

B. Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits for any week because he is in training with the approval of the department; nor shall such individual be denied benefits with respect to any week in which he is in training with the approval of the department by reason of the application of provisions in Section 71-5-511, subsection (c), relating to availability for work, or the provisions of subsection A(3) of this section, relating to failure to apply for, or a refusal to accept, suitable work.

C. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits for any week because he or she is in training approved under Section 236(a)(1) of the Trade Act of 1974, nor shall such individual be denied benefits by reason of leaving work to enter such training, provided the work left is not suitable employment, or because of the application to any such week in training of provisions in this law (or any applicable federal unemployment compensation law), relating to availability for work, active search for work or refusal to accept work.

For purposes of this section, the term “suitable employment” means with respect to an individual, work of a substantially equal or higher skill level than the individual’s past adversely affected employment (as defined for purposes of the Trade Act of 1974), and wages for such work at not less than eighty percent (80%) of the individual’s average weekly wage as determined for the purposes of the Trade Act of 1974.

D. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits for any week in which they are engaged in the Self-Employment Assistance Program established in Section 71-5-545 by reason of the application of Section 71-5-511(c), relating to availability for work, or the provisions of subsection A(3) of this section, relating to failure to apply for, or a refusal to accept, suitable work.

E. Any individual who is receiving benefits may participate in an approved training program under the Mississippi Employment Security Law to gain skills that may lead to employment while continuing to receive benefits. Authorization for participation of a recipient of unemployment benefits in such a program must be granted by the department and continuation of participation must be certified weekly by the participant recipient. While participating in such program approved by the department, availability and work search requirements will be waived. No individual will be allowed to participate in this program for more than twelve (12) weeks in any benefit year. Such participation shall not be considered employment for any purposes and shall not accrue benefits or wage credits. Participation in this training program shall meet the definition set forth in the U.S. Fair Labor Standards Act.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7379; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1944, ch. 288, § 1; Laws, 1954, ch. 353, § 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 519, § 5; Laws, 1977, ch. 497, § 8; Laws, 1982, ch. 480, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 364, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 498, § 3; Laws, 1986, ch. 316, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 365; Laws, 1994, ch. 303, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 464, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 405, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 39; Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 39; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 39; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 40; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 39, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-515.
Filing.

Claims for benefits shall be made in accordance with such regulations as the commission may prescribe. Each employer shall post and maintain in places readily accessible to individuals in his service printed statements concerning such regulations or such other matters as the commission may by regulation prescribe. Each employer shall supply such individuals copies of such printed statements or materials relating to claims for benefits as the commission may by regulation prescribe. Such printed statements or materials shall be supplied by the commission to each employer without cost to him.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7380; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 4a; Laws, 1964, ch. 442, § 1a.